Alabama, session 2026rs, HB327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
27 Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the following
28 terms have the following meanings:
Page 1

terms have the following meanings:
29 (1) COMMERCIAL USE. The use of the name, voice, or
30 likeness of an individual on or in any product, merchandise,
31 or good with the intent of advertising, marketing, selling, or
32 soliciting the purchase of any product, merchandise, good, or
33 service.
34 (2) DIGITAL REPLICA. A newly created,
35 computer-generated, highly realistic electronic representation
36 that is made for commercial use and is readily identifiable as
37 the voice or visual likeness of an individual which meets all
38 of the following criteria:
39 a. Is nearly indistinguishable from the actual voice or
40 visual likeness of the individual such that a reasonable
41 person would believe that the electronic representation is
42 only of that particular, actual individual.
43 b. Is embodied in a sound recording, image, audiovisual
44 work, including an audiovisual work that does not have any
45 accompanying sounds, or transmission in which either:
46 1. The actual individual described in paragraph a. did
47 not actually perform or appear; or
48 2. That is a version of a sound recording, image, or
49 audiovisual work in which the actual individual described in
50 paragraph a. did perform or appear but in which the
51 fundamental character of the performance or appearance has
52 been materially altered.
53 c. Does not include the electronic reproduction, use of
54 a sample of one sound recording or audiovisual work into
55 another, remixing, mastering, or digital remastering of a
56 sound recording or audiovisual work authorized by the
Page 2

sound recording or audiovisual work authorized by the
57 copyright holder.
58 (3) DIGITAL REPLICATION RIGHT. The right established by
59 this act.
60 (4) ELIGIBLE PLAINTIFF. A person authorized to bring an
61 action under this act.
62 (5) INDIVIDUAL. A natural or deceased person.
63 (6) MINOR. An individual younger than 18 years of age
64 who: (i) has never been married; and (ii) has not had the
65 disabilities of minority removed for general purposes.
66 (7) ONLINE SERVICE. a. Either of the following:
67 1. Any publicly accessible Internet website, online
68 service, online application, mobile application, virtual
69 reality environment, or cloud service provider.
70 2. A service engaged in the transmission of digital
71 audio transmissions as defined in 17 U.S.C. § 114(j)(5).
72 b. The term may include a social service, social
73 network, or application store.
74 c. The term does not include a service by wire or radio
75 which provides the replica, and, if applicable, any person
76 other than the depicted individual described in paragraph
77 (2)a. that acquires, through a license, inheritance, or
78 capability to transmit data to and receive data from all, or
79 substantially all, Internet endpoints, including any
80 capabilities that are incidental to enabling the operation of
81 the communications service of a provider of online services or
82 network access, or the operator of facilities for the service.
83 (8) ONLINE SERVICE PROVIDER. The owner of an online
84 service.
Page 3

service.
85 (9) PRODUCTION. The creation of a digital replica.
86 (10) RIGHT HOLDER. The individual whose voice or visual
87 likeness is simulated or otherwise copied in or as a digital
88 replica, or, if applicable, any person other than the depicted
89 individual that acquires, through a license, inheritance, or
90 otherwise, the right to authorize the use of the individual's
91 voice or visual likeness in a digital replica.
92 (11) SOUND RECORDING ARTIST. An individual who creates
93 or performs in sound recordings for economic gain or for the
94 livelihood of the individual.
95 Section 2. (a) A right holder may authorize the use of
96 the voice or visual likeness of the individual in a digital
97 replica. That right is both:
98 (1) Descendible and licensable, wholly or partly,
99 exclusively or nonexclusively, by the right holder, subject to
100 the terms of a contract, including a licensing agreement, or
101 testamentary instrument conveying digital replication rights
102 to a right holder; and
103 (2) Not assignable during the life of the individual to
104 whom the right applies.
105 (b) A digital replication right does not expire on the
106 death of the individual to whom the right applies, regardless
107 of whether the right is used commercially by the individual
108 during the individual's lifetime.
109 (c) On the death of an individual to whom the right
110 applies:
111 (1) The individual's digital replication right is
112 transferable and licensable, wholly or partly, by the
Page 4

transferable and licensable, wholly or partly, by the
113 executors, heirs, assigns, licensees, or devisees of the
114 individual; and
115 (2) Ownership of the right may be transferred, wholly
116 or partly, by operation of law, will, or intestate succession.
117 (d) A digital replication right is exclusive to both of
118 the following:
119 (1) The individual to whom the right applies, subject
120 to the licensing of the right during the lifetime of the
121 individual.
122 (2) The right holder for both of the following periods:
123 a. For a period of 10 years after the death of the
124 individual to whom the right applies.
125 b. Subject to Section 6, if the right holder
126 demonstrates active and authorized public use of the voice or
127 visual likeness of the individual in interstate or foreign
128 commerce during the two-year period preceding the expiration
129 of the 10-year period described in paragraph a., for an
130 additional five-year period, subject to renewal for additional
131 five-year periods, only if the right holder can demonstrate
132 authorized public use of the voice or visual likeness of the
133 individual in interstate or foreign commerce during the
134 two-year period preceding the expiration of each additional
135 five-year period.
136 (e) A digital replication right terminates on the
137 earlier of either of the following:
138 (1) The date on which the 10-year period or five-year
139 period, as applicable, described in subsection (d) expires
140 without renewal.
Page 5

without renewal.
141 (2) The date that is the earlier of 50 years after the
142 death of the individual or the date upon which the existing
143 common law right of publicity as recognized by the courts of
144 this state would terminate.
145 (f) If a right holder dies before October 1, 2026, the
146 right holder's digital replication rights vest in the
147 executors, heirs, assigns, or devisees of the right holder.
148 Section 3. (a) Except as provided by Section 4 and
149 subject to Section 4, a person may not intentionally publish,
150 display, distribute, or otherwise make available to the public
151 a digital replica without the written consent of the right
152 holder.
153 (b) It shall not be considered a violation of this
154 section for a person to manufacture, import, offer to the
155 public, provide, or otherwise distribute a product or service
156 unless the person directed the production of the digital
157 replica.
158 (c) This section shall not apply to a provider of
159 broadband Internet access services, as described in 47 C.F.R.
160 § 8.1, or its affiliate or subsidiary, or an information
161 service, system, or access software provider that provides or
162 enables computer access by multiple users to a computer
163 service, including specifically a service or system that
164 provides access to the Internet and systems operated or
165 services offered by libraries or educational institutions as
166 well as online service providers.
167 Section 4. (a) Except as provided by subsection (b), a
168 person may use a digital replica without the right holder's
Page 6

person may use a digital replica without the right holder's
169 consent if, regardless of the degree of fictionalization, the
170 digital replica meets any of the following criteria:
171 (1) Is used in a news, public affairs, informational
172 television, or sports television or radio broadcast or
173 account, so long as the digital replica is the subject of, or
174 is relevant to, the subject of the broadcast or account, or is
175 a representation of the individual in a documentary,
176 docudrama, or in a biographical or historical manner.
177 (2) Is produced or used in commentary, criticism,
178 scholarship, satire, or parody.
179 (3) Is used in a fleeting or negligible manner.
180 (4) Is used in a publication that reproduces or
181 distributes a digital replica provided to the publication by a
182 third party, provided the publication has no knowledge that
183 the digital replica violates this act.
184 (5) Is used in an advertisement or commercial
185 announcement for a purpose described in subdivisions (1)
186 through (4) and the digital replica is relevant to the subject
187 of the advertisement or announcement.
188 (6) Is used in a manner that is subject to and
189 protected by any rights, obligations, or immunities created by
190 the federal Communications Act of 1934, the rules and policies
191 of the Federal Communications Commission, other federal law,
192 or otherwise protected by the First Amendment of the United
193 States Constitution.
194 (b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a digital replica
195 used to depict sexually explicit conduct, as defined in 18
196 U.S.C. § 2256.
Page 7

U.S.C. § 2256.
197 Section 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), an
198 individual, during the individual's lifetime, may license the
199 individual's digital replication right. A license under this
200 subsection is valid only if the license agreement meets both
201 of the following criteria:
202 (1) Is in writing and signed by the individual or an
203 authorized representative of the individual.
204 (2) Includes a reasonably specific description of the
205 intended uses of the digital replica.
206 (b) Subsection (a) shall not affect the terms and
207 conditions of a license or contract other than those described
208 in this act, and the expiration of the license does not affect
209 the remainder of the license or related contract.
210 (c) Subsection (a) does not apply if the license is
211 governed by a collective bargaining agreement that addresses
212 digital replicas.
213 (d) A postmortem transfer or license of a digital
214 replication right is valid only if the testamentary instrument
215 transferring the right or the license agreement is in writing
216 and signed by the right holder or an authorized representative
217 of the right holder.
218 (e) A digital replica that is embodied in a sound
219 recording, image, audiovisual work, including an audiovisual
220 work that does not have any accompanying sounds, or
221 transmission where the use is authorized under the terms of a
222 license agreement may continue to be used in a manner
223 consistent with the terms of the license after the expiration
224 or termination of the license agreement.
Page 8

or termination of the license agreement.
225 (f) Subject to Section 2(f) and to the terms of a
226 contract, including a license agreement, or testamentary
227 instrument entered into before October 1, 2026, if a right
228 holder dies before October 1, 2026, the right holder's digital
229 replication rights vest in the executors, heirs, assigns, or
230 devisees of the right holder.
231 Section 6. The renewal of a right described by Section
232 2(d)(2) is only effective if, before the two-year period
233 described in Section 2(d)(2)b., the right holder files a
234 notice with the Secretary of State that contains all of the
235 following:
236 (1) The name of the deceased individual.
237 (2) A statement, under penalty of perjury, that the
238 right holder has engaged in active and authorized public use
239 of the voice or visual likeness during the applicable two-year
240 period.
241 (3) The identity of and contact information for the
242 right holder.
243 (4) Any other information the Secretary of State deems
244 necessary.
245 Section 7. (a) The Secretary of State shall maintain
246 and make available to the public a directory of postmortem
247 digital replication rights registered under Section 6.
248 (b) A right holder may voluntarily apply to the
249 Secretary of State for inclusion in the directory described in
250 subsection (a) by filing a notice with the Secretary of State
251 that complies with the form, content, and filing procedures
252 prescribed, by rule, by the Secretary of State.
Page 9

prescribed, by rule, by the Secretary of State.
253 (c) The Secretary of State may impose a filing fee on a
254 right holder for inclusion in the directory described in
255 subsection (a) in amounts necessary to cover the cost of
256 administering the directory.
257 Section 8. An action under Section 9 or 10 may only be
258 brought by one or more of the following parties:
259 (1) An exclusive right holder.
260 (2) If the individual described in subdivision (1) is a
261 minor, the parent or guardian of the exclusive right holder.
262 (3) Any other person that exclusively controls,
263 including through a license, the right to authorize the use of
264 the voice or visual likeness of the individual described in
265 subdivision (1).
266 (4) Any other person that owns or controls the right to
267 authorize the use or visual likeness of a deceased individual
268 described in subdivision (1).
269 (5) In the case of a digital replica of an individual
270 who is a sound recording artist, provided that the sound
271 recording artist has given a person express written
272 authorization to commence such a civil action on the
273 individual's behalf, any person that has entered into either
274 of the following:
275 a. A contract for the exclusive personal services of
276 the sound recording artist as a sound recording artist.
277 b. An exclusive license to distribute or transmit works
278 that capture the audio performance of the sound recording
279 artist, provided that the sound recording artist is an
280 individual and has given the person express written
Page 10

individual and has given the person express written
281 authorization to commence such a civil action on his or her
282 behalf.
283 Section 9. An eligible plaintiff may bring a private
284 cause of action against a person who violates or threatens to
285 violate this act to obtain:
286 (1) Injunctive relief; or
287 (2) Other equitable relief.
288 Section 10. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
289 term "knowingly" means having actual knowledge of or acting
290 with deliberate ignorance of the prohibition involved.
291 (b) An eligible plaintiff may bring a cause of action
292 against another person who knowingly violates Section 3.
293 (c) For the purposes of subsection (a), a person may be
294 presumed to have acted knowingly if the person willingly
295 avoided having knowledge that: (i) the applicable material is
296 a digital replica; and (ii) the digital replica was not
297 authorized by a right holder.
298 (d) A cause of action brought pursuant to this section
299 must commence within three years after the date on which the
300 person discovered, or with due diligence should have
301 discovered, the violation.
302 (e) In a cause of action brought under this section, a
303 person that violates Section 3 shall be liable for: (i) the
304 actual damages suffered by the injured party as a result of
305 the violation; (ii) disgorgement of any profits attributable
306 to the unauthorized use; and (iii) punitive damages if the
307 violator is found to have acted with wantonness, fraud, or
308 knowledge.
Page 11

knowledge.
309 (f) An online service provider that has acted
310 reasonably with regard to material claimed to be an
311 unauthorized digital replica may not be liable for statutory
312 or actual damages regardless of whether the material is
313 ultimately determined to be an unauthorized digital replica.
314 Section 11. This act shall only apply to an individual
315 who either: (i) is a resident of this state; or (ii) was a
316 resident of this state on the date the individual died.
317 Section 12. This act shall become effective on October
318 1, 2026.
Page 12